District of Columbia statutes.
50-2651

Curb loading zone management program.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a curb loading zone management program (“program”). The purpose of the program is to increase availability and efficiency of curb loading zones and reduce double parking by loading vehicles. The Mayor shall submit rules for this program to the Council pursuant to § 50-2652. The program rules may include:

(1)

Establishing loading zone meter fees;

(2)

Determining minimum curb loading zone space requirements;

(3)

Providing for enhanced enforcement, which may include the following:

(A)

Increased fines for violations;

(B)

Dedicated enforcement personnel;

(C)

Improved signage; and

(D)

Automated enforcement;

(4)

Determining eligibility for use of curb loading zones;

(5)

Providing for electronic payment cards; and

(6)

Establishing requirements for monitoring loading zone performance and for adjusting meter rates, loading zone space requirements, and enforcement to improve performance.

(b)

The Mayor shall consult with business organizations, residents, and other appropriate stakeholders in developing the curb loading zone management program.

History

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-66, § 2, 56 DCR 6608